New York, session 2025-2026, S757.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3-a of section 410-w of the social services 2 law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the social 3 services law relating to the use of child care block grant funds for the 4 statewide presumptive eligibility period for the receipt of child care 5 assistance, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 4667-A and A. 6 4099-A, is amended to read as follows: 7 3-a. A local social services district [shall] may, upon notification 8 to the office, utilize a presumptive eligibility standard to provide 9 child care assistance, in accordance with this subdivision. The office 10 of children and family services shall issue guidance regarding the 11 preliminary eligibility criteria to be used by local social services 12 districts utilizing a presumptive eligibility standard. 13 (a) A local social services district opting to utilize a presumptive 14 eligibility standard, shall, upon receipt of an application for child 15 care assistance, including all completed documentation required by the 16 district, complete a preliminary eligibility determination. 17 (b) If the family meets the preliminary eligibility criteria, the 18 family shall be presumed eligible for child care assistance for the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02833-01-5 S. 757 2 1 period from the date of the application to the date of the final eligi- 2 bility determination. 3 (c) A local social services district may utilize child care block 4 grant funds for the presumptive eligibility period to the extent permit- 5 ted by federal law. 6 (d) If, upon final determination, the application for child care 7 services is denied, the social services district shall send written 8 notice to the applicant of the determination of ineligibility and of the 9 applicant's right to a fair hearing in accordance with the regulations 10 of the office. 11 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the social 12 services law relating to the use of child care block grant funds for the 13 statewide presumptive eligibility period for the receipt of child care 14 assistance, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 4667-A and A. 15 4099-A, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately and shall be deemed to 17 have been in full force and effect on and after May 3, 2024] on the one 18 hundred eightieth day after it shall have become a law. Effective imme- 19 diately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 20 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 21 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 23 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 24 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the social 25 services law relating to the use of child care block grant funds for the 26 statewide presumptive eligibility period for the receipt of child care 27 assistance, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 4667-A and A. 28 4099-A, takes effect.